Missouri, session 2026, SB1413.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 34.378, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 34.378,
to read as follows:
34.378. 1. The state shall not enter into a
contingency fee contract with a private attorney unless the
attorney general makes a written determination prior to
entering into such a contract that contingency fee
representation is both cost effective and in the public
interest. Any written determination shall include specific
findings for each of the following factors:
(1) Whether there exists sufficient and appropriate
legal and financial resources within the attorney general's
office to handle the matter;
(2) The time and labor required; the novelty,
complexity, and difficulty of the questions involved; and
the skill requisite to perform the attorney services
properly;
(3) The geographic area where the attorney services
are to be provided; and
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1413 2
(4) The amount of experience desired for the
particular kind of attorney services to be provided and the
nature of the private attorney's experience with similar
issues or cases.
2. If the attorney general makes the determination
described in subsection 1 of this section, the attorney
general shall request written proposals from private
attorneys to represent the state, unless the attorney
general determines that requesting proposals is not feasible
under the circumstances and sets forth the basis for this
determination in writing. If a request for proposals is
issued, the attorney general shall choose the lowest and
best bid or request that the office of administration
establish an independent panel to evaluate the proposals and
choose the lowest and best bid.
3. The state shall not enter into a contract for
contingency fee attorney services unless the following
requirements are met throughout the contract period and any
extensions to the contract:
(1) The government attorneys shall retain complete
control over the course and conduct of the case;
(2) A government attorney with supervisory authority
shall oversee the litigation;
(3) The government attorneys shall retain veto power
over any decisions made by outside counsel;
(4) A government attorney with supervisory authority
for the case shall attend all settlement conferences; and
(5) Decisions regarding settlement of the case shall
be reserved exclusively to the discretion of the attorney
general.
4. The attorney general shall develop a standard
addendum to every contract for contingent fee attorney

SB 1413 3
services that shall be used in all cases, describing in
detail what is expected of both the contracted private
attorney and the state, including, without limitation, the
requirements listed in subsection 3 of this section.
5. Copies of any executed contingency fee contract and
the attorney general's written determination to enter into a
contingency fee contract with the private attorney shall be
posted on the attorney general's website for public
inspection within five business days after the date the
contract is executed and shall remain posted on the website
for the duration of the contingency fee contract, including
any extensions or amendments to the contract. Any payment
of contingency fees shall be posted on the attorney
general's website within fifteen days after the payment of
such contingency fees to the private attorney and shall
remain posted on the website for at least three hundred
sixty-five days.
6. Any private attorney under contract to provide
services to the state on a contingency fee basis shall, from
the inception of the contract until at least four years
after the contract expires or is terminated, maintain
detailed current records, including documentation of all
expenses, disbursements, charges, credits, underlying
receipts and invoices, and other financial transactions that
concern the provision of such attorney services. The
private attorney shall maintain detailed contemporaneous
time records for the attorneys and paralegals working on the
matter in increments of no greater than one-tenth of an hour
and shall promptly provide these records to the attorney
general, upon request. Any request under chapter 610 for
inspection and copying of such records shall be served upon
and responded to by the attorney general's office.

SB 1413 4
7. [Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8 of
this section, a retained private attorney shall not be
entitled to a fee, exclusive of any costs and expenses
described in subsection 8 of this section, of more than:
(1) Fifteen percent of that portion of any amount
recovered that is ten million dollars or less;
(2) Ten percent of that portion of any amount
recovered that is more than ten million dollars but less
than or equal to fifteen million dollars;
(3) Five percent of that portion of any amount
recovered that is more than fifteen million dollars but less
than or equal to twenty million dollars; and
(4) Two percent of that portion of any amount
recovered that is more than twenty million dollars.
8. The total fee payable to all retained private
attorneys in any matter that is the subject of a contingency
fee contract shall not exceed ten million dollars, exclusive
of any costs and expenses provided by the contract and
actually incurred by the retained private attorneys,
100 regardless of the number of actions or proceedings or the
101 number of retained private attorneys involved in the matter.
102 9. A contingency fee:
103 (1) Shall be payable only from moneys that are
104 actually received under a judgment or settlement agreement;
105 and
106 (2) Shall not be based on any amount attributable to a
107 fine or civil penalty.
108 10. As used in this section, "amount recovered" does
109 not include any moneys paid as costs.
110 11.] By February first of each year, the attorney
111 general shall submit a report to the president pro tem of
112 the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives

SB 1413 5
113 describing the use of contingency fee contracts with private
114 attorneys in the preceding calendar year. At a minimum, the
115 report shall:
116 (1) Identify all new contingency fee contracts entered
117 into during the year and all previously executed contingency
118 fee contracts that remain current during any part of the
119 year, and for each contract describe:
120 (a) The name of the private attorney with whom the
121 department has contracted, including the name of the
122 attorney's law firm;
123 (b) The nature and status of the legal matter;
124 (c) The name of the parties to the legal matter;
125 (d) The amount of any recovery; and
126 (e) The amount of any contingency fee paid;
127 (2) Include copies of any written determinations made
128 under subsections 1 and 2 of this section.
✓